District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Duke District BID Grantmaking Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Amendatory paragraph (4)(A) of section 6302(c)(3) of the Fiscal Year 2027
Budget Support Act of 2026, enacted on August 21, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-418; 73 DCR 11735) is
amended to read as follows:
“(4)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this subsection, within the first quarter
of Fiscal Year 2027, the Department of Small and Local Business Development shall award a
grant in the amount of $1 million from the Fund to support the Duke Business Improvement
District Corporation, d/b/a Duke District BID, to improve conditions for property owners,
businesses, residents, and visitors within the Greater Shaw/U Street area.”.
Sec. 3. Amendatory paragraph (4)(A) of section 6302(c)(3) of the Fiscal Year 2027
Budget Support Emergency Act of 2026, enacted August 21, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-416; 73 DCR
11509) is amended to read as follows:


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“(4)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this subsection, within the first quarter
of Fiscal Year 2027, the Department of Small and Local Business Development shall award a
grant in the amount of $1 million from the Fund to support the Duke Business Improvement
District Corporation, d/b/a Duke District BID, to improve conditions for property owners,
businesses, residents, and visitors within the Greater Shaw/U Street area.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.